Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.055

Factors to be considered by court. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

In exercising the discretion granted to the court under this chapter, the court shall consider without limitation:

(1) The exemptions from attachment, execution, or forced sale under Title 6 RCW and other applicable laws;

(2) Whether or not any separate property of the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is exempted from attachment, execution, or forced sale under Title 6 RCW or other applicable laws before and after the decedent's death;

(3) Whether or not exemptions from attachment, execution, or forced sale have been granted to the decedent or the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner in another jurisdiction;

(4) How principles of equity and fairness would allocate the statutory exemptions from attachment, execution, and forced sale under Title 6 RCW and other applicable laws among the decedent's surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and the decedent's surviving dependent children;

(5) How the laws of intestacy, if the decedent died intestate and without nonprobate assets, or the decedent's dispositive intent, if the decedent died testate or with nonprobate assets, would direct the decedent's property;

(6) The extent to which the claimant has other property that will satisfy the claimant's reasonable needs; and

(7) If the claimant is a child of the decedent, the child's ability or inability to meet the child's basic needs.

[ 2024 c 20 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.